Utah statutes.
63J-4a-202.   Duties and powers of inspector general and office.

(1)  The inspector general shall:

(a)  administer, direct, and manage the office;

(b)  inspect and monitor the following in relation to the state Medicaid program:

(i)  the use and expenditure of federal and state funds;

(ii)  the provision of health benefits and other services;

(iii)  implementation of, and compliance with, state and federal requirements; and

(iv)  records and recordkeeping procedures;

(c)  receive reports of potential fraud, waste, or abuse in the state Medicaid program;

(d)  investigate and identify potential or actual fraud, waste, or abuse in the state Medicaid program;

(e)  consult with the Centers for Medicaid and Medicare Services and other states to determine and implement best practices for discovering and eliminating fraud, waste, and abuse of Medicaid funds;

(f)  obtain, develop, and utilize computer algorithms to identify fraud, waste, or abuse in the state Medicaid program;

(g)  work closely with the fraud unit to identify and recover improperly or fraudulently expended Medicaid funds;

(h)  audit, inspect, and evaluate the functioning of the division to ensure that the state Medicaid program is managed in the most efficient and cost-effective manner possible;

(i)  regularly advise the department and the division of an action that should be taken to ensure that the state Medicaid program is managed in the most efficient and cost-effective manner possible;

(j)  refer potential criminal conduct, relating to Medicaid funds or the state Medicaid program, to the fraud unit;

(k)  determine ways to:

(i)  identify, prevent, and reduce fraud, waste, and abuse in the state Medicaid program; and

(ii)  recoup costs, reduce costs, and avoid or minimize increased costs of the state Medicaid program;

(l)  seek recovery of improperly paid Medicaid funds;

(m)  track recovery of Medicaid funds by the state;

(n)  in accordance with Section 63J-4a-501:

(i)  report on the actions and findings of the inspector general; and

(ii)  make recommendations to the Legislature and the governor;

(o)  provide training to agencies and employees on identifying potential fraud, waste, or abuse of Medicaid funds; and

(p)  develop and implement principles and standards for the fulfillment of the duties of the inspector general, based on principles and standards used by:

(i)  the Federal Offices of Inspector General;

(ii)  the Association of Inspectors General; and

(iii)  the United States Government Accountability Office.

(2)  The office may conduct a performance or financial audit of:

(a)  a state executive branch entity or a local government entity, including an entity described in Subsection 63J-4a-301(3), that:

(i)  manages or oversees a state Medicaid program; or

(ii)  manages or oversees the use or expenditure of state or federal Medicaid funds; or

(b)  Medicaid funds received by a person by a grant from, or under contract with, a state executive branch entity or a local government entity.

(3)  The inspector general, or a designee of the inspector general within the office, may take a sworn statement or administer an oath.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

